Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Financing of Tourism Development
148.857.
Preliminary and final approval of companies and projects — Meetings of authority.

The authority shall establish standards for preliminary approval and final approval of eligible companies and their projects by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The authority shall consult with the secretary when establishing standards to ensure that standards established pursuant to KRS 148.855(1) and subsection (1) of this section do not conflict.

After the authority’s preliminary approval, an agent designated by the cabinet shall hold at least one (1) public hearing to solicit public comments regarding the designation of an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company. Notice of the public hearing shall be given in accordance with KRS Chapter 424.

The authority shall review the report of the consultant prepared pursuant to KRS 148.855(4), the recommendation of the secretary, the report prepared by the agent documenting all comments, both written and oral, received at the public hearing required by subsection (3) of this section, and other information that has been made available to the authority in order to assist the authority in determining whether the tourism development project will further the purposes of KRS 148.851 to 148.860.

The criteria for final approval of eligible companies and tourism development projects shall include but not be limited to the criteria set forth in KRS 148.855(4). Final approval shall not be granted if it is determined that there is no projected net positive fiscal impact to the Commonwealth.

After a review of the consultant’s report, the recommendation of the secretary, and other information made available to the authority, the authority, by resolution, may grant to the eligible company the status of an approved company and authorize the execution of a tourism development project agreement as provided in KRS 148.859. The decision reached by the authority shall be final and no appeal shall be granted.

All meetings of the authority shall be held in accordance with KRS 61.805 to 61.850. The authority may, pursuant to KRS 61.815, hold closed sessions of its meetings to discuss matters exempt from the open meetings law and pertaining to an eligible company.

History.
Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 5, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 95, § 26, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 29, effective June 25, 2009; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 39, effective June 26, 2009.

148.859.
Agreement between authority and approved company.

The authority, upon adoption of its final approval, may enter into a tourism development agreement with any approved company. The terms of the agreement shall be negotiated between the authority and the approved company and shall include but not be limited to:

The amount of approved costs;

That any increase in approved costs incurred by the approved company and agreed to by the authority shall apply retroactively for purposes of calculating the carry forward for unused incentives;

A date certain by which the approved company shall have completed the tourism development project;

That the authority may grant an extension or change, which in no event shall exceed three (3) years from the date of final approval, to the completion date as specified in the agreement of an approved company;

That within three (3) months of the completion date, the approved company shall document the actual cost of the tourism development project through a certification of the costs to be provided by an independent certified public accountant acceptable to the authority;

The term of the tourism development agreement and the maximum amount of recovery;

That within forty-five (45) days after the end of each fiscal year of the approved company, during the term of the agreement, the approved company shall supply the authority with reports and certifications as the authority may request demonstrating to the satisfaction of the authority that the approved company is in compliance with the provisions of KRS 139.536 and KRS 148.851 to 148.860;

That the approved company shall notify the authority if any change in ownership of the tourism attraction is contemplated. The authority shall reserve the option to renegotiate the terms of the agreement or, if the change in ownership is detrimental to the Commonwealth, the authority may terminate the agreement;

That the approved company shall not receive a sales tax incentive as prescribed by KRS 139.536 with respect to any fiscal year if the requirements of KRS 148.853(2) have not been met;

That the authority may grant an extension of up to three (3) years to the completion date in addition to the extension provided for in paragraph (d) of this subsection, to an approved company that has completed at least fifty percent (50%) of an entertainment destination center project;

That in no event shall the completion date be more than six (6) years from the date of final approval; and

That the extension provided for in paragraph (j) of this subsection shall be subject to the following conditions:

The approved company shall have spent or have contractually obligated to spend an amount equal to or greater than the amount of approved costs set forth in the initial agreement;

The term of the agreement shall not be extended, except as provided in KRS 148.853(3)(b)4.; and

The scope of the entertainment destination center project, as set forth in the initial agreement, shall not be altered to include new or additional entertainment and leisure options.

The agreement, including the incentives provided under KRS 148.853, shall not be transferable or assignable by the approved company without the written consent of the authority and a passage of a resolution approving the proposed assignee of the incentives as an approved company.

History.
Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 6, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 73, § 5, effective March 18, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 565, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XXIV, § 2, effective March 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 184, § 16, effective June 20, 2005; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 40, effective June 26, 2009.

148.8591.
Annual report of tourism development project applications, approvals, and funding.

By November 1 of each year, the authority shall prepare an annual report. The report shall be posted to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet’s Web site.

The report shall include information for all projects approved after June 26, 2009.

The report shall include the following information:

For each approved project:

The name of the approved company and a brief description of the project;

The amount of approved costs included in the agreement;

The maximum amount of incentives the approved company may recover over the term of the agreement;

The term of the agreement; and

The total amount recovered under the agreement, reported for both the prior fiscal year and cumulatively;

The number of applications for projects submitted during the prior fiscal year;

The number of projects finally approved during the prior fiscal year; and

The total dollar amount approved for recovery for all projects approved during the prior fiscal year, and cumulatively under the Tourism Development Act since its inception, by year of approval.

The information required to be reported under this section shall not be considered confidential taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 41, effective June 26, 2009; 2014, ch. 134, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

148.860.
Short title for KRS 139.536 and KRS 148.851 to 148.860.

KRS 139.536 and KRS 148.851 to 148.860 shall be known as the Kentucky Tourism Development Act.

History.
Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 7, effective June 21, 2001.